Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2214
Administrator; policies and guidelines; required.

The administrator, with the advice of the commission, shall establish policies and guidelines for the implementation of the approved Capitol Landscape Restoration Master Plan on and around the capitol grounds, for site development in and around the State Capitol and capitol grounds, and for use of the State Capitol's preservation and adaptive-use spaces, including the adoption of a document of standards.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 14.